Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2510
Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

The Department of Health and Human Services is responsible for incorporating components required under the federal early intervention program into the mental health and developmental disabilities planning responsibilities of the department. The department shall provide technical assistance, planning, and coordination related to the incorporation of such components.

Laws 1991, LB 701, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 15;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 215;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 60;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 144.